Vermont statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Subchapter 3. Access to Public Records
§ 318a.
Executive Branch Agency Public Records Request System.

The Secretary of Administration shall maintain and update the Public Records Request System established pursuant to 2006 Acts and Resolves No. 132, Sec. 3 and 2011 Acts and Resolves No. 59, Sec. 13 with the information furnished under subsection (b) of this section and post System information on the website of the Agency of Administration.

All public agencies of the Executive Branch of the State:

that receive a written request to inspect or copy a record under this subchapter shall catalogue the request in the Public Records Request System established and maintained by the Secretary of Administration by furnishing the following information:

the date the request was received;

the agency that received the request;

the person that made the request, including a contact name;

the status of the request, including whether the request was fulfilled in whole, fulfilled in part, or denied;

if the request was fulfilled in part or denied, the exemption or other grounds asserted as the basis for partial fulfillment or denial;

the estimated hours necessary to respond to the request;

the date the agency closed the request; and

the elapsed time between receipt of the request and the date the agency closed the request; and

shall post in a conspicuous location on their respective websites a link to the location on the Agency of Administration’s website where Public Records Request System information is maintained.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 319.
Enforcement.

Any person aggrieved by the denial of a request for public records under this subchapter may apply to the Civil Division of the Superior Court in the county in which the complainant resides, or has his or her personal place of business, or in which the public records are situated, or in the Civil Division of the Superior Court of Washington County, to enjoin the public agency from withholding agency records and to order the production of any agency records improperly withheld from the complainant. In such a case, the court shall determine the matter de novo, and may examine the contents of such agency records in camera to determine whether such records or any part thereof shall be withheld under any of the exemptions set forth in section 317 of this title, and the burden of proof shall be on the public agency to sustain its action.

Except as to cases the court considers of greater importance, proceedings before the Civil Division of the Superior Court, as authorized by this section, and appeals there from, take precedence on the docket over all cases and shall be assigned for hearing and trial or for argument at the earliest practicable date and expedited in every way.

If the public agency can show the court that exceptional circumstances exist and that the agency is exercising due diligence in responding to the request, the court may retain jurisdiction and allow the agency additional time to complete its review of the records.

Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the court shall assess against the public agency reasonable attorney’s fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred in any case under this section in which the complainant has substantially prevailed.
(d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the court shall assess against the public agency reasonable attorney’s fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred in any case under this section in which the complainant has substantially prevailed.

The court may, in its discretion, assess against a public agency reasonable attorney’s fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred in a case under this section in which the complainant has substantially prevailed provided that the public agency, within the time allowed for service of an answer under V.R.C.P. 12(a)(1):

concedes that a contested record or contested records are public; and

provides the record or records to the complainant.

The court may assess against the complainant reasonable attorney’s fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred in any case under this section when the court finds that the complainant has violated V.R.C.P. 11.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 231

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2011, No. 59

, § 5.

§ 320.
Penalties.

Whenever the court orders the production of any public agency records, improperly withheld from the complainant and assesses against the agency reasonable attorney’s fees and other litigation costs, and the court additionally issues a written finding that the circumstances surrounding the withholding raise questions whether the agency personnel acted arbitrarily or capriciously with respect to the withholding, the Department of Human Resources if applicable to that employee, shall promptly initiate a proceeding to determine whether disciplinary action is warranted against the officer or employee who was primarily responsible for the withholding. The Department, after investigation and consideration of the evidence submitted, shall submit its findings and recommendations to the administrative authority of the agency concerned and shall send copies of the findings and recommendations to the officer or employee or his or her representative. The administrative authority shall take the corrective action that the Department recommends.

In the event of noncompliance with the order of the court, the Civil Division of the Superior Court may punish for contempt the responsible employee or official, and in the case of a uniformed service, the responsible member.

A person who willfully destroys, gives away, sells, discards, or damages a public record without having authority to do so shall be fined at least $50.00 but not more than $1,000.00 for each offense.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 231

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2003, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2007, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2011, No. 59

, § 6.